Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 7

Derivative Proceedings

43-38-701. Derivative actions.

A member may not commence a proceeding in the name of a domestic cooperative, unless the member was a member of the cooperative when the transaction complained of occurred, or unless the member becomes a member through transfer by operation of law from one who was a member at that time.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 26.

43-38-702. Complaint.

A complaint in a proceeding brought in the name of a cooperative must allege with particularity the demand made, if any, to obtain action by the board of directors or officers, and either that the demand was refused or ignored, or why the member did not make a demand.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 26.

43-38-703. Court approval needed to discontinue or settle a proceeding.

A proceeding commenced under this part may not be discontinued or settled without the court's approval. If the court determines that a proposed discontinuance or settlement will substantially affect the interest of the cooperative or a class of members and holders of financial rights, the court shall direct that notice be given the members and holders of financial rights affected. If notice is so directed to be given, the court may determine which one (1) or more parties to the suit shall bear the expense of giving the notice, in the proportions the court finds to be reasonable in the circumstances, and the amount of the expense shall be awarded as special costs of the suit and recoverable in the same manner as other taxable costs.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 26.

43-38-704. Expenses.

On termination of the proceeding the court may require the plaintiff to pay the defendant's reasonable expenses, including counsel fees, incurred in defending the proceeding, if it finds that the proceeding was commenced without reasonable cause.

If a derivative action is successful in whole or in part, or if anything is received by the plaintiff as a result of a judgment, compromise or settlement of any such action, the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable counsel fees. If anything is so received by the plaintiff, the court shall make the award of the plaintiff's expenses payable out of those proceeds and direct the plaintiff to remit to the cooperative the remainder thereof, and if those proceeds are insufficient to reimburse the plaintiff's reasonable expenses, the court may direct that the award of the plaintiff's expenses or portion thereof be paid by the cooperative.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 26.

43-38-705. Equitable relief.

If a cooperative or an officer or director of the cooperative violates a provision of this chapter, a court in this state may, in an action brought by a member of the cooperative, grant any equitable relief it considers just and reasonable in the circumstances and award expenses, including counsel fees and disbursements, to the member.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 26.